Nevada, session 83, SB46.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 463 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The jurisdiction of the Board to investigate and initiate a
hearing before the Commission pursuant to NRS 463.310, and the
jurisdiction of the Commission to conduct proceedings and impose
discipline in accordance with NRS 463.310 to 463.3145, inclusive,
is fully retained and may only be divested pursuant to regulations
adopted by the Commission for any circumstance where a person
licensed, registered, found suitable or preliminarily found suitable
by the Board or Commission pursuant to this chapter or chapter
462, 464 or 466 of NRS is no longer engaged in the activity or in
the position for which Board or Commission approval was issued
or granted.
2. The surrender or attempted surrender of a license,
registration, finding of suitability or preliminary finding of
suitability is not effective until accepted by the Board in the
manner provided in the regulations of the Commission.
3. The Commission shall adopt regulations that prescribe a
reasonable period:
(a) After which the jurisdiction of the Board and Commission
is divested and that govern the continuing jurisdiction of the
Board and Commission pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) For the Board to accept a surrender or attempted surrender
of a license, registration, finding of suitability or preliminary
finding of suitability and that govern the surrender or attempted
surrender pursuant to subsection 2.
Sec. 2. NRS 463.0163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.0163 “Hearing examiner” means a member of the Nevada
Gaming Control Board or Nevada Gaming Commission or other
person authorized by the Chair of the Nevada Gaming Control
Board or the Chair of the Nevada Gaming Commission to conduct
investigative hearings.
Sec. 3. NRS 463.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.110 1. The Board may hold regular and special meetings
at such times and places as it may deem convenient, and it may hold
at least one regular meeting each month.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. All meetings of the Board are open to the public except for
investigative hearings which may be conducted in private at the
discretion of the Board or hearing examiner.
3. A majority of the members constitutes a quorum of the
Board, and a majority of members present at any meeting
determines the action of the Board.
4. Investigative hearings may be conducted by one or more
members , [with the concurrence of a majority of the Board,] or by a
hearing examiner [appointed] authorized by the Chair of the Board,
without notice, at such times and places, within or without the State
of Nevada, as may be convenient.
Sec. 4. NRS 463.162 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.162 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3 and NRS 463.1725, it is unlawful for any person to:
(a) Lend, let, lease or otherwise deliver or furnish any
equipment of any gambling game, including any slot machine, for
any interest, percentage or share of the money or property played,
under guise of any agreement whatever, without having first
procured a state gaming license.
(b) Lend, let, lease or otherwise deliver or furnish, except by a
bona fide sale or capital lease, any slot machine under guise of any
agreement whereby any consideration is paid or is payable for the
right to possess or use that slot machine, whether the consideration
is measured by a percentage of the revenue derived from the
machine or by a fixed fee or otherwise, without having first
procured a state gaming license for the slot machine.
(c) Furnish services or property, real or personal, on the basis of
a contract, lease or license, pursuant to which that person receives
payments based on earnings or profits from any gambling game,
including any slot machine, without having first procured a state
gaming license.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to any person:
(a) Whose payments are a fixed sum determined in advance on a
bona fide basis for the furnishing of services or property other than a
slot machine.
(b) Who furnishes services or property under a bona fide rental
agreement or security agreement for gaming equipment.
(c) That is a wholly owned subsidiary of:
(1) A corporation, limited partnership or limited-liability
company holding a state gaming license; or
(2) A holding company or intermediary company, or publicly
traded corporation, that has registered pursuant to NRS 463.585 or
463.635 and which has fully complied with the laws applicable to it.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(d) Who is licensed as a manufacturer or distributor pursuant to
NRS 463.650.
(e) Who is found suitable by the Commission to act as an
independent agent.
 Receipts or rentals or charges for real property, personal property
or services do not lose their character as payments of a fixed sum or
as bona fide because of provisions in a contract, lease or license for
adjustments in charges, rentals or fees on account of changes in
taxes or assessments, escalations in the cost-of-living index,
expansions or improvement of facilities, or changes in services
supplied. Receipts of rentals or charges based on percentage
between a corporate licensee or a licensee who is a limited
partnership or limited-liability company and the entities enumerated
in paragraph (c) are permitted under this subsection.
3. The Commission may, upon the issuance of its approval or a
finding of suitability, exempt a holding company from the licensing
requirements of subsection 1.
4. The Board may require any person exempted by the
provisions of subsection 2 or paragraph (b) of subsection 1 to
provide such information as it may require to perform its
investigative duties.
5. The Board and the Commission may require a finding of
suitability or the licensing of any person who:
(a) Owns any interest in the premises of a licensed establishment
or owns any interest in real property used by a licensed
establishment whether the person leases the property directly to the
licensee or through an intermediary.
(b) Repairs, rebuilds or modifies any gaming device.
(c) Manufactures or distributes chips or gaming tokens for use in
this state.
(d) Operates a call center within this State as an agent of a
licensed race book or sports pool in this State in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Commission.
(e) Has invented, has developed or owns the intellectual
property rights to a game for which approval by the Commission is
being sought or has been received in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Commission.
(f) Conducts a tournament or contest on behalf of or in
conjunction with a gaming licensee.
6. If the Commission finds a person described in subsection 5
unsuitable, a licensee shall not enter into any contract or agreement
with that person without the prior approval of the Commission. Any
other agreement between the licensee and that person must be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
terminated upon receipt of notice of the action by the Commission.
Any agreement between a licensee and a person described in
subsection 5 shall be deemed to include a provision for its
termination without liability on the part of the licensee upon a
finding by the Commission that the person is unsuitable. Failure
expressly to include that condition in the agreement is not a defense
in any action brought pursuant to this section to terminate the
agreement. If the application is not presented to the Board within 30
days after demand, the Commission may pursue any remedy or
combination of remedies provided in this chapter.
Sec. 5. NRS 463.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.270 1. Subject to the power of the Commission to deny,
revoke, suspend, condition or limit licenses, any state license in
force may be renewed by the Commission for the next succeeding
license period upon proper application for renewal and payment of
state license fees and taxes as required by law and the regulations of
the Commission.
2. All state gaming licenses are subject to renewal on the first
day of each January and all quarterly state gaming licenses on the
first day of each calendar quarter thereafter.
3. Application for renewal must be filed with the Commission,
and all state license fees and taxes required by law, including,
without limitation, NRS 368A.200, 463.370, 463.373 to 463.3855,
inclusive, 463.660, 464.015 and 464.040, must be paid to the Board
on or before the dates respectively provided by law for each fee or
tax.
4. Application for renewal of licenses for slot machines only
must be made by the operators of the locations where such machines
are situated.
5. Any person failing to pay any state license fees or taxes due
at the times respectively provided shall pay in addition to such
license fees or taxes a penalty of not less than $50 or 25 percent of
the amount due, whichever is the greater, but not more than $1,000
if the fees or taxes are less than 10 days late and in no case in excess
of $5,000. The penalty must be collected as are other charges,
license fees and penalties under this chapter.
6. Any person who operates, carries on or exposes for play any
gambling game, gaming device or slot machine or who
manufactures, sells or distributes any gaming device, equipment,
material or machine used in gaming after the person’s license
becomes subject to renewal, and thereafter fails to apply for renewal
as provided in this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in
addition to the penalties provided by law, is liable to the State of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Nevada for all license fees, taxes and penalties which would have
been due upon application for renewal.
7. If any licensee or other person fails to renew his or her
license as provided in this section, the Commission may order the
immediate closure of all his or her gaming activity until the license
is renewed by the payment of the necessary fees, taxes, interest and
any penalties. Except for a license for which fees are based on the
gross revenue of the licensee, failure to renew a license within 30
days after the date required by this chapter shall be deemed a
surrender of the license.
8. The voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee does not
become effective until accepted in the manner provided in the
regulations of the Commission [.] adopted in accordance with
section 1 of this act. The surrender of a license does not relieve the
former licensee of any penalties, fines, fees, taxes or interest due.
Sec. 6. NRS 463.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.310 1. The Board shall make appropriate investigations:
(a) To determine whether there has been any violation of this
chapter or chapter 368A, 462, 464, 465 or 466 of NRS or any
regulations adopted thereunder.
(b) To determine any facts, conditions, practices or matters
which it may deem necessary or proper to aid in the enforcement of
any such law or regulation.
(c) To aid in adopting regulations.
(d) To secure information as a basis for recommending
legislation relating to this chapter or chapter 368A, 462, 464, 465 or
466 of NRS.
(e) As directed by the Commission.
2. If, after any investigation the Board is satisfied that:
(a) A license, registration, finding of suitability, preliminary
finding of suitability, pari-mutuel license or prior approval by the
Commission of any transaction for which the approval was required
or permitted under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 462, 464
or 466 of NRS should be limited, conditioned, suspended or
revoked; or
(b) A person or entity which is licensed, registered, found
suitable or found preliminarily suitable pursuant to this chapter or
chapter 464 of NRS or which previously obtained approval for any
act or transaction for which Commission approval was required or
permitted under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 464 of NRS
should be fined,
 the Board shall initiate a hearing before the Commission by filing
a complaint with the Commission in accordance with NRS 463.312
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
and transmit therewith a summary of evidence in its possession
bearing on the matter and the transcript of testimony at any
investigative hearing conducted by or on behalf of the Board.
3. Upon receipt of the complaint of the Board, the Commission
shall review the complaint and all matter presented in support
thereof, and shall conduct further proceedings in accordance with
NRS 463.3125 to 463.3145, inclusive.
4. After the provisions of subsections 1, 2 and 3 have been
complied with, the Commission may:
(a) Limit, condition, suspend or revoke the license of any
licensed gaming establishment or the individual license of any
licensee without affecting the license of the establishment;
(b) Limit, condition, suspend or revoke any registration, finding
of suitability, preliminary finding of suitability, pari-mutuel license,
or prior approval given or granted to any applicant by the
Commission;
(c) Order a licensed gaming establishment to keep an individual
licensee from the premises of the licensed gaming establishment or
not to pay the licensee any remuneration for services or any profits,
income or accruals on the investment of the licensee in the licensed
gaming establishment; and
(d) Fine each person or entity, or both, which is licensed,
registered, found suitable or found preliminarily suitable pursuant to
this chapter or chapter 464 of NRS or which previously obtained
approval for any act or transaction for which Commission approval
was required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter or
chapter 464 of NRS:
(1) Not [less than $25,000 and not more than $250,000 for
each separate violation of any regulation adopted pursuant to NRS
463.125 which is the subject of an initial or subsequent complaint;
or
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (1), not]
more than [$100,000] $500,000 for each separate violation of the
provisions of this chapter or chapter 368A, 464 or 465 of NRS or of
any regulations adopted thereunder, which is the subject of an initial
complaint ; and [not]
(2) Not more than [$250,000] $1,000,000 for each separate
violation of the provisions of this chapter or chapter 368A, 464 or
465 of NRS or of any regulations adopted thereunder, which is the
subject of any subsequent complaint.
 All fines must be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in the
State General Fund.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
5. For the second violation of any provision of chapter 465 of
NRS by any licensed gaming establishment or individual licensee,
the Commission shall revoke the license of the establishment or
person.
6. If the Commission limits, conditions, suspends or revokes
any license or imposes a fine, or limits, conditions, suspends or
revokes any registration, finding of suitability, preliminary finding
of suitability, pari-mutuel license or prior approval, it shall issue its
written order therefor after causing to be prepared and filed its
written decision upon which the order is based.
7. Any such limitation, condition, revocation, suspension or
fine so made is effective until reversed upon judicial review, except
that the Commission may stay its order pending a rehearing or
judicial review upon such terms and conditions as it deems proper.
8. Judicial review of any such order or decision of the
Commission may be had in accordance with NRS 463.315 to
463.318, inclusive.
Sec. 7. NRS 463.316 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.316 1. Upon written request of petitioner and upon
payment of such reasonable costs and fees as the Commission may
prescribe, the complete record on review, or such parts thereof as
are designated by the petitioner, must be prepared by the
Commission.
2. The complete record on review must include copies of:
(a) All pleadings in the case;
(b) All notices and interim orders issued by the Commission in
connection with the case;
(c) All stipulations;
(d) The decision and order appealed from;
(e) A transcript of all testimony, evidence and proceedings at the
hearing;
(f) The exhibits admitted or rejected; and
(g) Any other papers in the case.
 The original of any document may be used in lieu of a copy
thereof. The record on review may be shortened by stipulation of all
parties to the review proceedings.
3. The Commission shall transmit the record on review [must
be filed with] to the reviewing court within 30 days after service of
the petition for review [,] or 5 business days after the payment of
any costs and fees prescribed in subsection 1, whichever is later,
but the court may allow the Commission additional time to prepare
and transmit the record on review.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
4. Failure of the petitioner to pay the costs and fees
prescribed in subsection 1 in full within 30 days after service of
the petition for review shall constitute grounds for dismissal of the
petition.
Sec. 8. NRS 463.361 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.361 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 463.361 to
463.366, inclusive, and 463.780, gaming debts that are not
evidenced by a credit instrument are void and unenforceable and do
not give rise to any administrative or civil cause of action.
2. A claim by a patron of a licensee for payment of a gaming
debt that is not evidenced by a credit instrument may be resolved in
accordance with NRS 463.362 to 463.366, inclusive:
(a) By the Board; or
(b) If the claim is for less than [$500,] $1,000, by a hearing
examiner designated by the Chair of the Board.
Sec. 8.3. NRS 463.3664 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.3664 1. Upon written request of petitioner and upon
payment of such reasonable costs and fees as the Board may
prescribe, the complete record on review, or such parts thereof as
are designated by the petitioner, must be prepared by the Board.
2. The complete record on review must include copies of:
(a) All pleadings in the case;
(b) All notices and interim orders issued by the Board in
connection with the case;
(c) All stipulations;
(d) The decision and order appealed from;
(e) A transcript of all testimony, evidence and proceedings at the
hearing;
(f) The exhibits admitted or rejected; and
(g) Any other papers in the case.
 The original of any document may be used in lieu of a copy
thereof. The record on review may be shortened by stipulation of all
parties to the review proceedings.
3. The Board shall transmit the record on review [must be
filed with] to the reviewing court within 30 days after service of the
petition for review [,] or 5 business days after the payment of any
costs and fees prescribed in subsection 1, whichever is later, but
the court may allow the Board additional time to prepare and
transmit the record on review.
4. Failure of the petitioner to pay the costs and fees
prescribed in subsection 1 in full within 30 days after service of
the petition for review shall constitute grounds for dismissal of the
petition.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
Sec. 8.7. NRS 463A.190 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
463A.190 1. Upon written request of petitioner and upon
payment of such reasonable costs and fees as the Commission may
prescribe, the complete record on review, or such parts thereof as
are designated by the petitioner, [shall] must be prepared by the
Commission.
2. The complete record on review [shall] must include copies
of:
(a) All notices and statements in the matter;
(b) All notices and interim orders issued by the Commission in
connection with the matter;
(c) All stipulations;
(d) The decision and order appealed from;
(e) A transcript of all testimony, evidence and proceedings at the
hearing;
(f) The exhibits admitted or rejected; and
(g) Any other papers in the matter.
 The original of any document may be used in lieu of a copy
thereof. The record on review may be shortened by stipulation of all
parties to the review proceedings.
3. The Commission shall transmit the record on review [shall
be filed with] to the reviewing court within 30 days after service of
the petition for review [,] or 5 business days after the payment of
any costs and fees prescribed in subsection 1, whichever is later,
but the court may allow the Commission additional time to prepare
and transmit the record on review.
4. Failure of the petitioner to pay the costs and fees
prescribed in subsection 1 in full within 30 days after service of
the petition for review shall constitute grounds for dismissal of the
petition.
Sec. 9. NRS 463.169 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)